Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.080

Licenses—Denial—Suspension—Revocation.

The department is authorized to deny, suspend, or revoke a license after a hearing in any case in which it is determined that there has been a violation or refusal to comply with the requirements of this chapter, rules adopted hereunder, or the provisions of Article 7 of Title 62A RCW as enacted or hereafter amended. All hearings for the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license shall be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW (Administrative Procedure Act) as enacted or hereafter amended.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 238 s 15; 1963 c 124 s 8.]